Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-212
License, defined.

License shall mean any license to conduct bingo as provided in section 9-233, any license for a utilization-of-funds member as provided in section 9-232.01, any manufacturer's license as provided in section 9-255.09, any distributor's license as provided in section 9-255.07, any gaming manager's license as provided in section 9-232.01, or any commercial lessor's license as provided in section 9-255.06.

Laws 1983, LB 259, § 14;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 9-140.10;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 13;

Laws 1988, LB 295, § 6;

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 7;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 16.